Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1752.02
Solid waste collection service; commencement; limitation.

A municipality shall not commence municipal solid waste collection in an area described in section 18-1752.01 for one year after the date of the resolution of intent to serve the area unless (1) the municipality contracts with the private entity currently providing the service to continue the service for the same one-year period of time, (2) the municipality provides for the service through property taxes or other general funds in whole or in part, (3) the private entity currently providing such service discontinues the service to the area, or (4) the private entity currently providing such service fails to provide such service under the same terms and conditions which the municipality provides to residents of the municipality through the municipal solid waste collection service.

Laws 1995, LB 629, § 2.